test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_22_opettaaja_oahpa_gt-norm-dial_Var.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - opettaaja - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Nom: opettaja # kaksi vai yksi a?
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Gen: opettajan
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Par: opettajaa
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Tra: opettajaksi
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Abe: opettajatta
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ine: opettajassa
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ela: opettajasta
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ill: opettajhaan
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ade: opettajala
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Abl: opettajalta
     opettaaja+N+Sg+All: opettajale
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ess: opettajana
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Nom: opettajat
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Gen: opettajitten
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Par: opettajia
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Tra: opettajiksi
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Abe: opettajitta
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ine: opettajissa
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ela: opettajista
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ill: opettajhiin
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ade: opettajila
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Abl: opettajilta
     opettaaja+N+Pl+All: opettajile
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ess: opettajina
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Com: opettajine
